Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211C.01, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Serious crime. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end "Serious crime" meansnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) a crime that is punished as a felony, as defined in section 609.02; new text end new text begin (2)new text end a crime that is punished as a gross misdemeanor, as defined in section 609.02, and that involves assault, intentional injury or threat of injury to person or public safety, dishonesty, harassment, aggravated driving while intoxicated, coercion, obstruction of justice, or the sale or possession of controlled substancesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end deleted text begin (b) "Serious crime" also meansdeleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a crime that is punished as a misdemeanor, as defined in section 609.02, and that involves assault, intentional injury or threat of injury to person or public safety, dishonesty, coercion, obstruction of justice, or the sale or possession of controlled substances. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to recall petitions initiated on or after that date. new text end